Utah statutes.
58-37-14.   Resort for illegal use or possession of controlled substances
deemed common nuisance -- District court power to suppress and enjoin.
(1) Any store, shop, warehouse, dwelling house, building, vehicle, boat,
aircraft, or other place to which users or possessors of any controlled
substances, listed in schedules I through V, resort or where use or possession
of any substances violates this act, or which is used for illegal keeping,
storing, or selling any substances listed as controlled substances in
schedules I through V shall be deemed a common nuisance. No person shall open,
keep, or maintain any such place.
(2)  The district court has the power to make any order necessary or
reasonable to suppress any nuisance and to enjoin any person or persons from
doing any act calculated to cause, or permit the continuation of a nuisance.
